Mississippi statutes. Title 65. Highways, Bridges and Ferries
Additions to and Deletions from State System after 1971

§§ 65-3-72 through 65-3-95.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2000, ch. 574, § 11, eff from and after passage (May 20, 2000).

§65-3-72. [Laws, 1972, ch. 309, § 1; ch. 455, §§ 1-4; repealed, Laws, 1981, ch. 464, § 32; reenacted without change, Laws, 1985, ch. 537, § 22; reenacted without change, Laws, 1987, ch. 510, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 1987]

§65-3-73. [Laws, 1973, ch. 350, § 1, ch. 449, §§ 1-4; Laws, 1977, ch. 421; Laws, 1978, ch. 480, § 1; repealed, Laws, 1981, ch. 464, § 32; reenacted without change, Laws, 1985, ch. 537, § 23; reenacted without change, Laws, 1987, ch. 510, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 1987]

§65-3-74. [Laws, 1974, ch. 501, §§ 1-5; repealed, Laws, 1981, ch. 464, § 32; reenacted without change, Laws, 1985, ch. 537, § 24; reenacted without change, Laws, 1987, ch. 510, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 1987]

§65-3-75. [Laws, 1975, ch. 371; ch. 406, §§ 1-3; Laws, 1984, ch. 344; reenacted without change, Laws, 1985, ch. 537, § 25; reenacted without change, Laws, 1987, ch. 510, § 18, eff from and after July 1, 1987]

§65-3-76. [Laws, 1976, ch. 353, §§ 1-3, ch. 414, §§ 1-3; repealed, Laws, 1981, ch. 464, § 32; reenacted without change, Laws, 1985, ch. 537, § 26; reenacted without change, Laws, 1987, ch. 510, § 19, eff from and after July 1, 1987]

§65-3-77. [Laws, 1977, ch. 422, eff from and after passage (approved March 31, 1977)]

§65-3-78. [Laws, 1978, ch. 304, § 1, ch. 309, § 1, ch. 315, §§ 1, 2, eff from and after passage (approved February 22, 1978)]

§65-3-79. [Laws, 1979, ch. 342, §§ 1-4; Laws, 1979, ch. 459; Laws, 1979, ch. 498; Laws, 1979, ch. 499; repealed, Laws, 1981, ch. 464, § 32; reenacted without change, Laws, 1985, ch. 537, § 27; reenacted without change, Laws, 1987, ch. 510, § 20, eff from and after July 1, 1987]

§65-3-81. [Laws, 1980, ch. 345; ch. 405; ch. 538; ch. 539, eff from and after passage (approved May 26, 1980)]

§65-3-83. [Laws, 1981, ch. 478, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 15, 1981)]

§65-3-85. [Laws, 1983, ch. 352; Laws, 1983, ch. 417, §§ 1-4; Laws, 1983, ch. 462, eff from and after passage (approved April 4, 1983)]

§65-3-87. [Laws, 1983, ch. 430, §§ 1-4, eff from and after passage (approved March 29, 1983)]

§65-3-89. [Laws, 1984, ch. 304; Laws, 1984, ch. 323; Laws, 1984, ch. 345; Laws, 1984, ch. 483; Laws, 1984, ch. 484, eff from and after passage (approved May 14, 1984)]

§65-3-91. [Laws, 1985, ch. 318, §§ 1-3; Laws, 1985, ch. 426, §§ 1-3 ; Laws, 1985, ch. 532; Laws, 1987, ch. 322, § 3, eff July 1, 1987]

§65-3-93. [Laws, 1986, ch. 334, §§ 1-3, eff from and after passage (approved March 19, 1986)]

§65-3-95. [Laws, 1987, ch. 311, §§ 1-4, eff from and after passage (approved March 11, 1987)]